Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.110

Defective return—Further return—Hearing—Judgment.

If the return of the writ be defective, the court may order a further return to be made. When a full return has been made, the court must hear the parties, or such of them as may attend for that purpose, and may thereupon give judgment, either affirming or annulling or modifying the proceedings below.

[ 1895 c 65 s 11; RRS s 1009.]